Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-3342.02
State Disbursement Unit; timely disbursement required.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the State Disbursement Unit shall disburse all support order payments received within two business days after receipt.

(2) The State Disbursement Unit may delay the disbursement of collections toward arrearages until the resolution of any timely appeal with respect to such arrearages.

Laws 2000, LB 972, § 2.